Tennessee statutes. Title 66 Property
Part 2

Truth in Construction and Consumer Protection Act of 1975

66-11-201. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Truth in Construction and Consumer Protection Act of 1975.”

Acts 1975, ch. 364, § 1; T.C.A., § 64-1152.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 18 Tenn. Juris., Lis Pendens, § 6.

Law Reviews.

Survey of Tennessee Property Law, VII. Registration of Instruments (Toxey H. Sewell), 46 Tenn. L. Rev. 160, 193 (1979).

66-11-202. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context or subject matter indicates another meaning, the words and phrases defined in §66-11-101, as amended and as may from time to time be amended, have the same meaning as set out in that section and such §66-11-101 as amended and as may from time to time be amended is incorporated in this part by reference.

Acts 1975, ch. 364, § 2; T.C.A., § 64-1153.

Law Reviews.

Survey of Tennessee Property Law, VII. Registration of Instruments (Toxey H. Sewell), 46 Tenn. L. Rev. 160, 193 (1979).

66-11-203. Notice to owner.

Any contractor who is about to enter into a contract, either written or oral, for improving residential real property, as that term is defined by §66-11-146, with the owner or owners thereof shall, prior to commencing the improvement of the residential real property or making of the contract, deliver, by registered mail or otherwise, to the owner or owners of the residential real property to be improved written notice in substantially the following form:

Delivered this day of , 20 , by , Contractor.

The above-captioned contractor hereby gives notice to the owner of the property to be improved, that the contractor is about to begin improving the property according to the terms and conditions of the contract and that under the provisions of the state law (§§66-11-101 —66-11-141) there shall be a lien upon the real property and building for the improvements made in favor of the above-mentioned contractor who does the work or furnishes the materials for such improvements for a duration of one (1) year after the work is finished or materials furnished.

Contractor

Acts 1975, ch. 364, § 3; 1977, ch. 456, § 1; T.C.A., § 64-1154; Acts 1994, ch. 587, § 1; 2020, ch. 749, § 12.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 42 provided that the act, which amended this section, applies to actions occurring and contracts entered into, amended, or renewed on or after July 1, 2020.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment, in the first paragraph, inserted “residential” three times, and “, as that term is defined by §66-11-146,”; redesignated former (1) to the end of the present third paragraph, following “state law (§§66-11-101 -66-11-141)”; in the present third paragraph, inserted “above-mentioned” and deleted “, mechanic, laborer, founder or machinist,” preceding “who does the work”; and deleted former (2) and (3) which read: “(2) Except as modified by §66-11-146, every person contracted with or employed to work on the buildings or to furnish materials for the same with the above-named contractor shall have a lien on the property for that person's work or material; provided, that such person notify the owner in writing within ninety (90) days after the completion of the improvement, which lien will continue for ninety (90) days after such notice; (3) Except as modified by § 66-11-146, these liens can be enforced even though the contractor has been paid in full if the contractor has not paid the persons who furnished the labor or materials for the improvement.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 42. July 1, 2020.

Cross-References. Certified mail instead of registered mail, §1-3-111.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 8-701.

Law Reviews.

Survey of Tennessee Property Law, VII. Registration of Instruments (Toxey H. Sewell), 46 Tenn. L. Rev. 160, 193 (1979).

66-11-204. Rejection of contracts.

An owner of residential real property may reject a contract by notifying the contractor by written notice by registered mail within three (3) days after receipt of the notice required in §66-11-203; otherwise the contract is affirmed.

Acts 1975, ch. 364, § 4; 1977, ch. 456, § 2; T.C.A., § 64-1155; Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 13.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 42 provided that the act, which amended this section, applies to actions occurring and contracts entered into, amended, or renewed on or after July 1, 2020.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment inserted “of residential real property”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 42. July 1, 2020.

Cross-References. Certified mail instead of registered mail, §1-3-111.

Law Reviews.

Mechanics' Liens in Tennessee — Recent Developments, 6 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 519 (1976).

66-11-205. Contractor's notice to owner that all liens have been paid — Guarantee — Form.

Upon completion of the contract or improvement and upon receipt of the contract price, the prime contractor shall deliver by registered mail or otherwise to the owner or owners of the real property a sworn affidavit and receipt substantially in the following form:

State of Tennessee

County of

On this day of , 20 , before me personally appeared (if a corporation use “ President (or other officer) of (Corporate Name) a corporation”), prime contractor, to me personally known, who being duly sworn by oath, did say that all of the persons, firms, and corporations, including the prime contractor and all remote contractors and laborers, who have furnished services, labor, or materials according to the plans or specifications, or extra items used in the construction or repair of buildings and improvements on the real estate hereinafter described, have been paid in full or will be paid in full no later than ten (10) days from the date a bill is rendered for such services, labor, or materials and that such work has been fully completed and accepted by the owner, and further that such owner has paid the contract price in full, the receipt of which is hereby acknowledged. Affiant further says that no claims have been made to affiant by, nor is any suit pending on behalf of the prime contractor or any remote contractors or laborers, and further that no chattel mortgages or conditional bills of sale have been given or are now outstanding as to any materials, appliances, fixtures, or furnishings placed upon or installed in the aforementioned premises. Affiant as a party does for a valuable consideration hereby agree and guarantee to hold the owner of the real estate, the owner's successors, heirs and assigns, harmless against any lien, claim, or suit by any remote contractor or laborer and against chattel mortgages or conditional bills of sale in conjunction with the construction of such buildings or improvements on such real estate.

The real estate and improvements referred to herein are situated in the County of , State of Tennessee, and are described as follows: (give street address)

Prime Contractor

Sworn to and subscribed before me

on the date above first written.

Notary Public

My Commission Expires:

Acts 1975, ch. 364, § 5; 1977, ch. 456, § 3; T.C.A., § 64-1156; Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 14.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 42 provided that the act, which amended this section, applies to actions occurring and contracts entered into, amended, or renewed on or after July 1, 2020.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment substituted “prime contractor” for “contractor” three times; inserted “substantially” in the first paragraph; and in the form, substituted “including the prime contractor and all remote contractors and laborers,” for “including general contractors and all subcontractors,” in the first sentence, in the second sentence, substituted “the prime contractor or any remote contractors or laborers” for “any contractors, subcontractors, laborers or materialmen” and substituted “any remote contractor or laborer” for “any general contractor, subcontractor, mechanic or materialman” in the third sentence.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 42. July 1, 2020.

Cross-References. Certified mail instead of registered mail, §1-3-111.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 8-707.

Law Reviews.

Mechanics' Lien in Tennessee — Recent Developments, 6 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 519 (1976).

66-11-206. Noncompliance by contractor — Misdemeanor — Penalties — Owner remedies.

In the event that any materialmen's liens or mechanics' liens are perfected, filed or enforced under part 1 of this chapter against any real estate for transactions covered under §§ 66-11-203 and 66-11-205 and the contractor has not complied with §§ 66-11-203 and 66-11-205 or if having technically complied with this part has willfully, knowingly and unlawfully falsified any statements or fraudulently obtained any permission, the contractor commits a Class B misdemeanor.

Nothing contained in this part shall abrogate the right of any person who is materially or personally damaged or injured by any contract covered by this part to seek such person's remedies against the responsible person in the courts.

Noncompliance with §§ 66-11-203 and 66-11-205 shall in no way affect the lien rights of a contractor, actually performing the work and having a contract directly with an owner, or the owner's agent, to enforce a lien as provided in § 66-11-102.

Acts 1975, ch. 364, § 6; 1977, ch. 456, § 4; T.C.A., § 64-1157; Acts 1982, ch. 941, §§ 1, 2; 1989, ch. 591, § 112; 2020, ch. 749, § 15.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 42 provided that the act, which amended this section, applies to actions occurring and contracts entered into, amended, or renewed on or after July 1, 2020.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment substituted “or the owner’s agent” for “or the contractor’s agent” in (c).

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 749, § 42. July 1, 2020.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, §40-35-111.

Law Reviews.

Survey of Tennessee Property Law, VII. Registration of Instruments (Toxey H. Sewell), 46 Tenn. L. Rev. 160, 193 (1979).

Collateral References.

Validity and construction of statute providing criminal penalties for failure of contractor who has received payment from owner to pay laborers or materialmen. 78 A.L.R.3d 563.

66-11-207. Effect on other laws.

This part shall not operate to repeal or affect any of the laws of the state relating to mechanics' and materialmen's liens, specifically part 1 of this chapter, but shall be held and construed as ancillary and supplemental thereto.

Acts 1975, ch. 364, § 7; T.C.A., § 64-1158.

Law Reviews.

Mechanics' Liens in Tennessee — Recent Developments, 6 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 519 (1976).

66-11-208. Real estate improvement contracts — Certain venue provisions prohibited.

Except as provided in subsection (b), a provision in any contract, subcontract or purchase order for the improvement of real property in this state is void and against public policy if it makes the contract, subcontract or purchase order subject to the substantive laws of another state or mandates that the exclusive forum for any litigation, arbitration or other dispute resolution process is located in another state.

The prohibition of subsection (a) shall not apply to any contract, subcontract or purchase order for the improvement of real property which is located partially in this state and partially in another state or states. Venue in a dispute over such contract may be in any state in which part of the property is located.

Acts 1993, ch. 37, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1993, ch. 37, § 2 provided that this section shall apply to all contracts, subcontracts or purchase orders to which this section applies entered into on or after July 1, 1993.

Law Reviews.

Avoiding Unnecessary Punches: Skillful Crafting of Alternative Dispute Resolution Contract Clauses (David K. Taylor), 36 No. 4 Tenn. B.J. 20 (2000).